District of Columbia statutes.
31-1131.09

Exemption from examination and prelicensing education.

(a)

An individual who applies for a resident insurance producer license in the District shall not be required to complete any prelicensing education (if prelicensing education is required by the Commissioner pursuant to § 31-1131.05a) or examination if:

(1)

The individual is currently licensed for the same line of authority in another state; or

(2)

(A)

The application is received within 90 days of the cancellation of the applicant’s previous license for the same lines of authority in another state; and

(B)

(i)

The prior state issues a certification that, at the time of cancellation, the person was in good standing in that state; or

(ii)

The state’s producer database records, maintained by the NAIC, its affiliates, or subsidiaries, indicate that the producer is or was licensed in good standing for the line of authority requested.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Repealed.

(e)

Repealed.

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 9, 50 DCR 260
May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-155, § 2(k), 55 DCR 3683
This section is referenced in § 31-1131.05 and § 31-1131.06.
D.C. Law 17-155 rewrote the section.